Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-607
Making, using, or uttering slugs; terms, defined; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unlawfully using slugs, if he makes, uses, or utters a slug or slugs with intent to deprive a supplier of property or service sold or offered by means of a coin machine or with knowledge that he is facilitating such a deprivation by another person.

(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) Slug shall mean an object which by size, shape, or any other quality is capable of being inserted, deposited, or otherwise used in a coin machine as an improper but effective substitute for a genuine coin, bill, or token;

(b) Coin machine shall mean a coin box, turnstile, vending machine, or other mechanical or electronic device or receptacle designed to receive a coin or bill of a specified denomination or a token made for the purpose and in return for the insertion or deposit thereof to mechanically offer, provide, assist in providing or permit the acquisition of property or a public or private service; and

(c) Value of the slug or slugs shall mean the value of the coins, bills, or tokens for which they are being substituted.

(3) The making, using, or uttering of slugs of the value of one hundred dollars or more is a Class I misdemeanor.

(4) The making, using, or uttering of slugs of the value of less than one hundred dollars is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 129.